Iowa, session 2025-2026, HF442.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF IOWA: 3 TLSB 1905HH (2) 91 ll/jh H.F. 442 Section 1. Section 558A.1, Code 2025, is amended by adding 1 the following new subsections: 2 NEW SUBSECTION . 3A. âLead service lineâ means a service 3 line which is made of lead. For the purposes of this 4 subsection, a galvanized service line is considered a lead 5 service line if the line ever was or is currently downstream of 6 any lead service line or service line of unknown material. 7 NEW SUBSECTION . 4A. âService lineâ means the pipe 8 connecting the water main to the interior plumbing in a 9 building. 10 Sec. 2. Section 558A.4, subsection 1, paragraph a, Code 11 2025, is amended to read as follows: 12 a. The disclosure statement shall include information 13 relating to the condition and important characteristics of the 14 property and structures located on the property, including 15 significant defects in the structural integrity of the 16 structure and the presence of lead service lines , as provided 17 in rules which shall be adopted by the real estate commission 18 pursuant to section 543B.9 . The rules may require the 19 disclosure to include information relating to the propertyâs 20 zoning classification; the condition of plumbing, heating, or 21 electrical systems; or the presence of pests. 22